Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2244
Assistant probation officers; pilot program; purpose; report.

(1) The probation administrator shall create a pilot program to hire additional assistant probation officers as provided in this section.

(2) The pilot program shall be limited to a single probation district.

(3) Assistant probation officers hired under this section shall assist probation officers in the supervision of high-risk caseloads.

(4) The purpose of the pilot program is to determine whether additional support for probation officers results in probationers completing their terms of probation with fewer violations.

(5) On or before June 1, 2024, the probation administrator shall electronically submit a report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature regarding the pilot program. The report shall include the total number of persons admitted into the pilot program, including demographic information, criminal history, and top needs according to the results of a risk assessment; conditions of supervision; the total number of violations of supervision conditions; the number of supervision discharges by type of discharge; and recidivism rates.

Laws 2023, LB50, § 13.